Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-494
License; revocation; grounds.

Whenever a license is issued to any person and the holder thereof violates or is found guilty of a violation of any of the provisions of sections 37-484 to 37-496 or of any misrepresentation in obtaining such license, the license so issued to such a person may be revoked by the commission, and the secretary of the commission may, in his or her discretion, refuse to issue any license to such person for the period of one year thereafter.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 12, p. 496;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-912;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 204.